Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 5
Title Loan Act

§ 28-46-501. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Title Loan Act.”

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-501, as added by 2006, ch. 323, § 1, p. 1023.

§ 28-46-502. Definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Title lender” means a regulated lender authorized pursuant to this part to make title loans.

“Title loan” means a loan for a consumer purpose that is secured by a nonpurchase money security interest in titled personal property and that is scheduled to be repaid in either a single installment or in multiple installments that are not fully amortized. Title loans are regulated consumer loans and, except as otherwise provided in this part, all provisions of the Idaho credit code relating to regulated consumer loans apply to title loans and to persons engaged in the business of making title loans.

“Title loan agreement” means a written agreement whereby a title lender agrees to make a title loan to a debtor, and the debtor agrees to give the title lender a security interest in unencumbered titled personal property owned by the debtor. Except as otherwise provided in this part, all provisions of chapter 9, title 28, Idaho Code, apply to title loans and to persons engaged in the business of making title loans.

“Titled personal property” means any motor vehicle, the ownership of which is evidenced and delineated by a state issued certificate of title, but does not include a motor home, mobile home or manufactured home.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-502, as added by 2006, ch. 323, § 1, p. 1023.

§ 28-46-503. License required.

No person shall engage in the business of making title loans without having first obtained a license from the administrator pursuant to this chapter authorizing the person to make regulated consumer loans.

Any title loan made without first having obtained a license is void, in which case the person making the loan forfeits the right to collect any moneys, including principal, interest, and any other fee paid by the debtor in connection with the title loan agreement. The person making the title loan shall release its security interest in the titled personal property used as security for the title loan and shall return to the debtor:

The certificate of title for such titled personal property;

Such titled personal property if the person making the loan took possession of such property;

The fair market value of such titled personal property if the person making the loan took possession of such property and is not able to return such property; and

All principal, interest, and any other fees paid by the debtor.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-503, as added by 2006, ch. 323, § 1, p. 1023.

§ 28-46-504. Title loan agreements.

Every title lender shall keep a numbered record of each and every title loan agreement executed by the title lender and debtor. Such record, as well as the title loan agreement, shall include the following information:

The make, model and year of the titled personal property;

The vehicle identification number, or other comparable identification number, along with the license plate number, if applicable, of the titled personal property;

The name, residential address and date of birth of the debtor;

The date the title loan agreement is executed by the title lender and the debtor; and

The maturity date of the title loan agreement.

The following information shall also be printed on the title loan agreement:

The name and physical address of the title loan office;

In not less than twelve (12) point bold type, the name and address of the administrator as well as a telephone number to which consumers may address complaints;

The following statement in not less than twelve (12) point bold type and in all capitalized letters:

You will be required to pay additional interest and fees if you renew this loan rather than pay the debt in full when due.

This loan may be a higher interest loan. You should consider what other lower cost loans may be available to you.

You are placing at risk your continued ownership of the titled personal property you are using as security for this loan.

If you default under this loan the title lender may take possession of the titled personal property used as security for this loan and sell the property in the manner provided by law.

If you enter into a title loan agreement, you have a legal right of rescission. This means you may cancel your contract at no cost to you by returning the money you borrowed by the next business day after the date of your loan.

If you believe that the title lender has violated the provisions of the Idaho Title Loan Act, you have the right to file a written complaint with the Idaho Department of Finance and the Department will investigate your complaint.”

“(1) This loan is not intended to meet long-term financial needs.

(2) You should use this loan only to meet short-term cash needs.

(d) The statement that “The debtor represents and warrants, to the best of the debtor’s knowledge, that the titled personal property is not stolen and has no liens or encumbrances against it, the debtor has the right to enter into this transaction and will not apply for a duplicate certificate of title while the title loan agreement is in effect.”

(3) The debtor shall sign the title loan agreement and shall be provided with a copy of such agreement. The title loan agreement shall also be signed by the title lender or the title lender’s employee or agent. If the debtor has been issued a social security number, the title lender shall keep on file the social security number of the debtor.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-504, as added by 2006, ch. 323, § 1, p. 1023.

§ 28-46-505. Disclosure.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 28-46-103, Idaho Code, or any other law to the contrary, in accordance with the Idaho administrative procedure act, chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, the administrator may promulgate rules requiring each title lender to issue a standardized consumer notification and disclosure form in compliance with federal truth-in-lending laws prior to entering into any title loan agreement. The required style, content and method of executing the form may be prescribed by the rule and shall be designed to ensure that the debtor, prior to entering into such agreement, receives and acknowledges an accurate and complete notification and disclosure of the itemized and total amounts of all interest, fees, charges and other costs that will or potentially could be imposed as a result of such agreement.

A title lender shall conspicuously post in each licensed location the statements listed in section 28-46-504(2)(c), Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-505, as added by 2006, ch. 323, § 1, p. 1023.

§ 28-46-506. Renewal of title loan agreements.

Title loan agreements shall not exceed thirty (30) days in length. However, such agreements may provide for renewals, which may occur automatically, unless one (1) of the following has occurred:

The debtor has paid all principal and finance charges due in accordance with the title loan agreement;

The debtor has surrendered possession, title and all other interest in and to the titled personal property to the title lender; or

The title lender has notified the debtor in writing that the title loan agreement is not to be renewed.

A debtor has the right to cancel the debtor’s obligation to make payments under a title loan agreement until the close of the next business day after the day when the debtor signs a title loan agreement if the debtor returns the original check or cash to the location where the loan was originated. For the purpose of this section, “business day” means any day that the title loan office is open for business.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part 5 to the contrary, beginning with the third renewal or continuation and at each successive renewal or continuation thereafter, the debtor shall be required to make a payment of at least ten percent (10%) of the principal amount of the original title loan in addition to any finance charges that are due. Finance charges due at each successive renewal or continuation shall be calculated on the outstanding principal balance. Principal payments in excess of the ten percent (10%) required principal reduction shall be credited to the outstanding principal on the day received. If at the maturity of any renewal requiring a principal reduction, the debtor has not made previous principal reductions adequate to satisfy the current required principal reduction, and the debtor cannot repay at least ten percent (10%) of the original principal balance and any outstanding finance charges, the title lender may, but shall not be obligated to, defer any required principal payment until a future date. No further finance charges may accrue on any such principal amount thus deferred.

Within fourteen (14) days after a title loan is automatically renewed, the title lender shall provide the debtor written notice of the renewal either by personal delivery to the debtor or by deposit in the regular mail to the debtor’s residential address listed in the title loan agreement. For the purpose of this section, a renewal is any extension of a title loan for an additional period without any change in the terms of the title loan other than extension of the maturity date and a reduction in principal.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-506, as added by 2006, ch. 323, § 1, p. 1023.

§ 28-46-507. Default.

Before exercising any of its rights upon a default by a debtor under a title loan agreement, the title lender shall mail a “Notice to Cure Default” to the debtor at the debtor’s last address shown in the title lender’s file, notifying the debtor that the debtor has ten (10) days from the date of the notice in which to cure the default.

If the debtor does not cure the default within the ten (10) days, the title lender may proceed to exercise its rights under chapter 9, title 28, Idaho Code. There shall be no further finance charges assessed to the debtor after the title lender has obtained possession of the titled personal property.

Upon voluntary surrender of the titled personal property used as security for a title loan, the title lender shall have no obligation to send any “Notice to Cure Default” to the debtor.

Title lenders may assess and collect reasonable expenses of collection and enforcement as authorized by chapter 9, title 28, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-507, as added by 2006, ch. 323, § 1, p. 1023.

§ 28-46-508. Prohibited actions.

No title lender licensee under this part or person required under this part to have such license shall:

Enter into a title loan agreement with a person less than eighteen (18) years of age, or with anyone who appears to be intoxicated;

Make any agreement giving the title lender any recourse against the debtor other than the title lender’s right to take possession of the titled personal property and certificate of title upon the debtor’s default, and to sell or otherwise dispose of the titled personal property in accordance with the provisions of chapter 9, title 28, Idaho Code, except where the debtor prevented repossession of the vehicle, damaged or committed or permitted waste on the vehicle or committed fraud;

Enter into a title loan agreement in which the amount of money loaned, when combined with the outstanding balance of other outstanding title loan agreements the debtor has with the same lender secured by any single titled personal property, exceeds the retail value of the titled personal property as determined by common motor vehicle appraisal guides;

Accept any waiver, in writing or otherwise, of any right or protection accorded a debtor under this chapter;

Fail to exercise reasonable care to protect from loss or damage the certificate of title in the physical possession of the title lender;

Purchase titled personal property used as security for a title loan made by the title lender;

Enter into a title loan agreement unless the debtor presents a clear title to titled personal property at the time that the loan is made. If the title lender files a lien against such titled personal property without possession of a clear title to such property, the resulting lien shall be void;

Capitalize or add any accrued interest or fee to the original principal of the title loan agreement during any renewal of the agreement;

Require a debtor to provide any additional guaranty as a condition to entering into a title loan agreement;

Use any device or agreement, including agreements with affiliated title lenders, with the intent to obtain greater charges than otherwise would be authorized by this part; or

Violate the provisions of this part or any rule promulgated pursuant thereto.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-508, as added by 2006, ch. 323, § 1, p. 1023; am. 2013, ch. 54, § 7, p. 108.

§ 28-46-509. Exemption.

The provisions of this part shall not apply to any person licensed or chartered under the laws of any state or of the United States as a bank, savings and loan association, credit union, insurance company, or industrial loan company. The terms “bank,” “savings and loan association,” “credit union,” “insurance company” and “industrial loan company” shall include employees and agents of such organizations as well as wholly-owned subsidiaries of such organizations, provided that the subsidiary is regularly examined by the chartering state or federal agency for consumer compliance purposes.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-46-509, as added by 2006, ch. 323, § 1, p. 1023.

Idaho Code Chs. 47, 48